New Jersey, session 221, S2667.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall prepare a notice that, at a minimum: (1)   provides information to alert a senior citizen about the different ways in which the senior citizen may be contacted for, or lured into providing, information or funds for a fraudulent purpose; and (2)   advises a senior citizen of ways to prevent the loss of funds or identity theft. b.    The notice prepared pursuant to this section shall be: (1)   regularly revised and updated by the director, as appropriate, to reflect the most current information on fraud and identity theft; and (2)   annually distributed to senior citizens pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    a.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall annually disseminate the notice on fraud and identity theft that is prepared by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  At a minimum, the notice shall be distributed to: (1)   members of the public, upon request; and (2)   each organization that is contracted by or receives State funding from the Department of Human Services and that provides services to senior citizens 60 years of age or older, for dissemination thereby to senior citizens in the course of business. b.    The commissioner shall annually post an updated copy of the notice on fraud and identity theft that is prepared by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) on the Internet website of the Department of Human Services. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.